Missouri, session 2026, SB1111.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 513.475, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 513.475,
to read as follows:
513.475. 1. The homestead of every person, consisting
of a dwelling house and appurtenances, and the land used in
connection therewith, not exceeding the value of [fifteen]
fifty thousand dollars, which is or shall be used by such
person as a homestead, shall, together with the rents,
issues and products thereof, be exempt from attachment and
execution. The exemption allowed under this section shall
not be allowed for more than one owner of any homestead if
one owner claims the entire amount allowed under this
subsection; but, if more than one owner of any homestead
claims an exemption under this section, the exemption
allowed to each of such owners shall not exceed, in the
aggregate, the total exemption allowed under this subsection
as to any one homestead.
2. Either spouse separately shall be debarred from and
incapable of selling, mortgaging or alienating the homestead
in any manner whatever, and every such sale, mortgage or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1111 2
alienation is hereby declared null and void; provided,
however, that nothing herein contained shall be so construed
as to prevent the husband and wife from jointly conveying,
mortgaging, alienating or in any other manner disposing of
such homestead, or any part thereof.
✓